Maryland, session 2025, HB0810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–1011.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ABUSE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–501 OF THE FAMILY
LAW ARTICLE.
(3) “DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 6–233 OF THIS ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0810*

HOUSE BILL 810
(4) “LETHALITY ASSESSMENT PROTOCOL” MEANS A MULTIPRONG
VALIDATED TOOL THAT:
(I) IS INTENDED TO BE USED BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER
DURING THE INVESTIGATION OF A DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME;
(II) USES EVIDENCE–BASED QUESTIONS TO ASSESS AN
INDIVIDUAL’S RISK OF BEING INJURED OR KILLED BY THE INDIVIDUAL’S INTIMATE
PARTNER; AND
(III) INCLUDES OFFERING LOCAL RESOURCES TO INDIVIDUALS
WHO ARE LIKELY TO BE INJURED OR KILLED BY AN INTIMATE PARTNER.
(B) EACH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL ADOPT A POLICY REQUIRING
THE USE OF A LETHALITY ASSESSMENT PROTOCOL TO EVALUATE ANY PERSON
BELIEVED TO BE A VICTIM OF OR INJURED IN RELATION TO A DOMESTICALLY
RELATED CRIME OR ABUSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.